Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-8,100
Interstate bridges; acquisition of property; responsibilities.

The department and the adjoining state concerned shall be separately responsible within their respective states for the temporary or permanent acquisition of the land, real or personal property, or any easement or interest therein, which may be necessary or desirable for interstate bridge purposes.

Laws 1959, c. 175, § 10, p. 637.